District of Columbia statutes.
7-203

Appointment and duties of Registrar.

The Director of the Department of Health shall appoint the Registrar who shall:

(1)

Be in charge of administering the vital records system and be the custodian of its records; and

(2)

Develop and distribute forms or other means for transmitting data to carry out the reporting and registration purposes of this chapter.

History

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 4, 28 DCR 3271
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-299, § 2(b), 50 DCR 388

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-608.01 and § 7-228.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-203.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-299 substituted “Department of Health” for “Department of Human Services”.